Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2669.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 40, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-850, to read: START_STATUTE40-850. Railroad; train length A railroad operating in this state may not run or be allowed to run on any part of a main track or branch line a train that exceeds eight thousand feet in length. END_STATUTE